Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF156.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1959YH (1) 91 jm/md H.F. 156 Section 1. Section 359.43, subsection 1, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 1. The township trustees may levy an annual tax not 3 exceeding forty and one-half ninety-one cents per thousand 4 dollars of assessed value of the taxable property in the 5 township, excluding property within a benefited fire district 6 or within the corporate limits of a city, for the purpose of 7 exercising the powers and duties specified in section 359.42 . 8 However, in a township having a fire protection service or 9 emergency medical service agreement or both service agreements 10 with a special charter city having a paid fire department, 11 the township trustees may levy an annual tax not exceeding 12 fifty-four cents per thousand dollars of the assessed value of 13 the taxable property for the services authorized or required 14 under section 359.42 and in a township which is located within 15 a county having a population of three hundred thousand or more, 16 the township trustees may levy an annual tax not exceeding 17 sixty-seven and one-half cents per thousand dollars of assessed 18 value of taxable property for the services authorized or 19 required under section 359.42 . 20